Washington statutes.
RCW 4.56.111

Interest on judgments—Rate.

The rate of interest required by RCW 4.56.110(3) (a) and (b) applies to the accrual of interest:

(1) As of the date of entry of judgment with respect to a judgment that is entered on or after June 10, 2010; and

(2) As of June 10, 2010, with respect to a judgment that was entered before June 10, 2010, and that is still accruing interest on June 10, 2010.

[ 2010 c 149 s 2.]